test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-azuum_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - azūm: # Noun 153 'eng /est ase/fin' - full paradigm
     azūm+N+Sg+Nom: azūm
     azūm+N+Sg+Gen: azūm
     azūm+N+Sg+Par: azūmt
     azūm+N+Sg+Dat: azūmõn
     azūm+N+Sg+Ins: azūmõks
     azūm+N+Sg+Ill: azūmõ
     azūm+N+Sg+Ela: azūmõst
     azūm+N+Pl+Nom: [aʼzmõd, azmõd]
     azūm+N+Pl+Gen: [aʼzmõd, azmõd]
     azūm+N+Pl+Par: [aʼzmidi, azmidi]
     azūm+N+Pl+Dat: [aʼzmõdõn, azmõdõn]
     azūm+N+Pl+Ins: [aʼzmõdõks, azmõdõks] 
     azūm+N+Pl+Ill: [aʼzmiž, azmiž]
     azūm+N+Pl+Ela: [aʼzmist, azmist]
